Rhode Island statutes. Title 36 Public Officers and Employees
Chapter 12 Insurance Benefits

36-12-1.
Definitions.

The following words, as used in §§

36-12-1

—

36-12-1

4, shall have the following meanings:

“Employer,” means the state of Rhode Island.

“Employee,” means all persons who are classified employees as the term “classified employee” is defined under §

36-3-3

, and all persons in the unclassified and non-classified service of the state; provided, however, that the following shall not be included as “employees” under §§

36-12-1

—

36-12-14

:

Part-time personnel whose work week is less than twenty (20) hours a week and limited period and seasonal personnel;

Members of the general assembly, its clerks, doorkeepers, and pages.

“Dependents” means an employee’s spouse, domestic partner and unmarried children under nineteen (19) years of age. Domestic partners shall certify by affidavit to the benefits director of the division of personnel that the (i) partners are at least eighteen (18) years of age and are mentally competent to contract, (ii) partners are not married to anyone, (iii) partners are not related by blood to a degree which would prohibit marriage in the state of Rhode Island, (iv) partners reside together and have resided together for at least one year, (v) partners are financially interdependent as evidenced by at least two (2) of the following: (A) domestic partnership agreement or relationship contract; (B) joint mortgage or joint ownership of primary residence, (C) two (2) of: (I) joint ownership of motor vehicle; (II) joint checking account; (III) joint credit account; (IV) joint lease; and/or (D) the domestic partner has been designated as a beneficiary for the employee’s will, retirement contract or life insurance. Misrepresentation of information in the affidavit will result in an obligation to repay the benefits received, and a civil fine not to exceed one thousand dollars ($1,000) enforceable by the attorney general and payable to the general fund. The employee will notify the benefits director of the division of personnel by completion of a form prescribed by the benefits director when the domestic partnership ends.

“Retired employee,” means all persons retired from the active service of the state, who, immediately prior to retirement, were employees of the state as determined by the retirement board under §

36-8-1

, and also all retired teachers who have elected to come under the employees’ retirement system of the state of Rhode Island.

“State retiree,” means all persons retired from the active service of the state who, immediately prior to retirement, were employees of the state as determined by the retirement board under §

36-8-1

.

“Teacher retiree,” means all retired teachers who have elected to come under the employees’ retirement system of the state of Rhode Island.

“Long-term healthcare insurance,” means any insurance policy or rider advertised, marketed, offered, or designed to provide coverage for not less than twelve (12) consecutive months for each covered person on an expense incurred, indemnity, prepaid, or other basis for one or more necessary or medically necessary diagnostic, preventive, therapeutic, rehabilitative, maintenance, or personal care services, provided in a setting other than an acute care unit of a hospital. The term includes: group and individual policies or riders whether issued by insurers, fraternal benefit societies, nonprofit health, hospital, and medical service corporations; prepaid health plans, health maintenance organizations; or any similar organization. Long-term healthcare insurance shall not include: any insurance policy which is offered primarily to provide basic medicare supplement coverage; basic hospital expense coverage; basic medical-surgical expense coverage; hospital confinement indemnity coverage; major medical expense coverage; disability income protection coverage; accident only coverage; specified disease or specified accident coverage; or limited benefit health coverage. This list of excluded coverages is illustrative and is not intended to be all inclusive.

“Non-Medicare-eligible retiree healthcare insurance,” means the health benefit employees who retire from active service of the state (subsequent to July 1, 1989), who immediately prior to retirement were employees of the state as determined by the retirement board pursuant to §

36-8-1

, shall be entitled to receive until attaining Medicare eligibility. This healthcare insurance shall be equal to semi-private hospital care, surgical/medical care and major medical with a one hundred seventy-five dollar ($175) calendar year deductible. The aforementioned program will be provided on a shared basis in accordance with §

36-12-4

.

“Medicare-eligible retiree healthcare insurance,” means the health benefit employees who retire from active service of the state (subsequent to July 1, 1989), who immediately prior to retirement were employees of the state as determined by the retirement board pursuant to §

36-8-1

, shall have access to when eligible for Medicare. This healthcare insurance shall include plans providing hospital care, surgical/medical services, rights and benefits which, when taken together with their federal Medicare program benefits, 42 U.S.C. § 1305 et seq., shall be comparable to those provided for retirees prior to the attainment of Medicare eligibility.

“Health reimbursement arrangement,” or “HRA” means an account that:

Is paid for and funded solely by state contributions;

Reimburses a Medicare-eligible state retiree for medical care expenses as defined in § 213(d) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, which includes reimbursements for healthcare insurance premiums;

Provides reimbursements up to a maximum dollar amount for a coverage period; and

Provides that any unused portion of the maximum dollar amount at the end of a coverage period is carried forward to increase the maximum reimbursement amount in subsequent coverage periods.

History of Section.

P.L. 1960, ch. 136, § 1; P.L. 1967, ch. 105, § 1; P.L. 1988, ch. 433, § 1; P.L. 1989, ch. 227, § 2; P.L. 1989, ch. 542, § 88; P.L. 2001, ch. 110, § 1; P.L. 2013, ch. 144, art. 2, § 1.

36-12-2.
Hospital care and surgical-medical service benefits.

Employees of the state of Rhode Island shall receive, in addition to wages, salaries, and any other remuneration or benefits, hospital care and surgical-medical services, rights, and benefits purchased by the director of administration pursuant to §

36-12-6

, with the specific condition that the benefits and services provided by the carrier(s) will be substantially equivalent to those set forth in any collective bargaining agreement(s) executed between the state of Rhode Island and authorized representatives of the unions representing state employees or the health care coverage presently being provided.

The state will work diligently with leadership of organized labor in order to ensure competitive, cost effective health care services for all employees of the state who may be eligible for those benefits.

Any new plan must accept pre-existing conditions for those individuals who will be covered by the new policy.

Part-time employees whose work week is less than twenty (20) hours a week may purchase the benefits set forth above. The employees shall pay the same rate for the benefits as the group rate paid by the state for the benefits. Payments for the benefits may be deducted in accordance with the provisions of §

36-12-3

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1960, ch. 136, § 2; P.L. 1966, ch. 226, § 1; P.L. 1967, ch. 105, § 2; P.L. 1984, ch. 310, § 1; P.L. 1996, ch. 326, § 6.

36-12-2.1.
Health insurance benefits — Coverage for abortions excluded.

The state of Rhode Island shall not include in any health insurance contracts, plans, or policies covering employees, any provision which shall provide coverage for induced abortions (except where the life of the mother would be endangered if the fetus were carried to term, or where the pregnancy resulted from rape or incest). This section shall be applicable to all contracts, plans or policies of:

All health insurers subject to title 27;

All group and blanket health insurers subject to title 27;

All nonprofit hospital, medical, surgical, dental, and health service corporations;

All health maintenance organizations; and

Any provision of medical, hospital, surgical, and funeral benefits and of coverage against accidental death or injury when the benefits or coverage are incidental to or part of other insurance authorized by the statutes of this state.

Provided, however, that the provisions of this section shall not apply to benefits provided under existing collective bargaining agreements entered into prior to June 30, 1982.

Nothing contained herein shall be construed to pertain to insurance coverage for complications as the result of an abortion.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 290, § 1; P.L. 1983, ch. 262, § 1; P.L. 2019, ch. 27, § 8.

36-12-2.2.
Disabled retired employees — Hospital care and surgical-medical service benefits.

Notwithstanding any other provision of the law to the contrary, an employee of the state of Rhode Island who retires under the provisions of title 36 of the Rhode Island general laws with a disability pension benefit shall receive only the following state-sponsored health care and subsidies:

Disabled retired employees who retire on or before September 30, 2008, and who are at least sixty (60) years of age as of September 30, 2008.

Any disabled retired employee of the state of Rhode Island who retires on or before September 30, 2008, and is at least sixty (60) years of age as of September 30, 2008, will be eligible until age sixty-five (65) to continue to purchase hospital care and surgical-medical service benefits as set forth in §

36-12-2

and as are received by classified employees. Furthermore, if he/she retired subsequent to July 1, 1989, he/she shall receive for himself or herself a subsidy on the individual medical plan in accordance with the following formula until attaining age sixty-five (65):

Any disabled retired employee of the state of Rhode Island who retires on or before September 30, 2008, and is at least sixty-five (65) years of age as of September 30, 2008, will be eligible to continue to purchase hospital care and surgical-medical service benefits as set forth in §

36-12-2

and as are received by classified employees. Furthermore, if he/she retired subsequent to July 1, 1989, he/she shall receive for himself or herself a subsidy on his or her individual medical plan in accordance with the following formula applied to the cost of the Medicare supplemental plan:

Payment for the coverage shall be at the same group rate used by the state in making payment for state employees.

Disabled retired employees who retire after September 30, 2008, or are under sixty (60) years of age on September 30, 2008. Any disabled retired employee of the state of Rhode Island who retires after September 30, 2008, or any disabled retired employee of the state of Rhode Island who is under sixty (60) years of age on September 30, 2008, will be eligible to receive state-sponsored medical coverage and subsidies as follows:

If the retiree is under fifty-nine (59) years of age, the retiree shall have the right to purchase hospital care and surgical-medical service benefits as set forth in §

36-12-2

and as are received by classified employees. Payment for the coverage shall be at the same group rate used by the state in making payment for state employees.

Furthermore, if the retiree is under fifty-nine (59) years of age, and retired after July 1, 1989, and before September 30, 2008, and the retiree had a minimum of twenty-eight (28) years of total service, he/she shall receive for himself or herself a ninety percent (90%) subsidy on the individual medical plan until attaining age fifty-nine (59).

At age fifty-nine (59) the retiree and his/her dependents shall be eligible only for enrollment in the medical plans available to non-disabled state employee retirees. If the retiree has a minimum of ten (10) years of contributory service, and up to twenty (20) years of total service, the retiree will be eligible for a fifty percent (50%) state subsidy on the cost of the individual retiree medical plan. If the retiree has a minimum of ten (10) years of contributory service, and twenty (20) years or more of total service, the retiree will be eligible for an eighty percent (80%) state subsidy on the cost of the individual retiree medical plan. The retiree is responsible for full payment for any additional dependent plans.

Disabled retired employees who retire after September 30, 2008, or are under sixty-five (65) years of age on September 30, 2008. Any disabled retired employee of the state of Rhode Island who retires after September 30, 2008, or any disabled retired employee of the state of Rhode Island who is under sixty-five (65) years of age on September 30, 2008, will be eligible to receive only the following state-sponsored medical coverage and subsidies upon attaining age sixty-five (65):

If the retiree is eligible for Medicare at age sixty-five (65), the retiree and spouse shall enroll in a state-sponsored Medicare supplemental plan.

If a retiree is not eligible for Medicare at age sixty-five (65), the retiree may remain in the same medical plan that the retiree was enrolled in prior to attaining age sixty-five (65).

If the retiree has a minimum of ten (10) years of contributory service, and up to twenty (20) years of total service, the retiree will receive a fifty percent (50%) state subsidy based on the cost of the individual Medicare supplemental plan. If the retiree has a minimum of ten (10) years of contributory service and twenty (20) years or more of total service, the retiree will be eligible for an eighty percent (80%) state subsidy based on the cost of the individual Medicare supplemental plan. The retiree is responsible for full payment for any additional dependent plans.

Payments for retiree and dependent medical coverage shall be deducted from the purchaser’s retirement benefits received pursuant to chapter 10 of this title.

Years of Service State’s Share Employee’s Share 10 - 15 50% 50% 16 - 22 70% 30% 23 - 27 80% 20% 28+ 100% 0%

Click to view

Years of Service State’s Share Employee’s Share 10 - 15 50% 50% 16 - 19 70% 30% 20 - 27 90% 10% 28+ 100% 0%

Click to view

History of Section.

P.L. 1985, ch. 450, § 1; P.L. 2008, ch. 9, art. 4, § 2; P.L. 2011, ch. 363, § 31.

36-12-2.3.
Health insurance benefits — Administrative services fees for continued coverage requirements of group health plans.

In accordance with the Tax Reform Act of 1986 (P.L. 99-514), amending § 162(k) of the Federal Internal Revenue Code, 26 U.S.C. § 162(k), in the Consolidated Omnibus Budget Reconciliation Act of 1985 (COBRA), 42 U.S.C. § 403, a general revenue receipt account is created to be used solely for deposit of any applicable administrative services fees.

History of Section.

P.L. 1989, ch. 126, art. 42, § 1; P.L. 1995, ch. 370, art. 40, § 110.

36-12-2.4.
Health insurance benefits — COBRA.

For purposes of fulfilling any employer obligations under the Consolidated Omnibus Budget Reconciliation Act of 1985 (COBRA), 42 U.S.C. § 403 et seq., a domestic partner shall be deemed a dependent of an employee as defined herein.

History of Section.

P.L. 2006, ch. 189, § 2; P.L. 2006, ch. 316, § 2.

36-12-2.5.
Health insurance benefits — Coverage of former spouse.

Commencing January 1, 2014, a state employee’s family health plan shall not provide coverage to a former spouse unless the former spouse was covered by said plan in accordance with §

27-20.4-1

as of December 31, 2013.

History of Section.

P.L. 2013, ch. 144, art. 3, § 1.

36-12-3.
Deductions from pay.

Payments for hospital care and surgical-medical services, rights, and benefits of dependents of employees may be deducted from the state payroll as provided in §§

36-6-12

and

36-6-13

. Payments for surgical-medical services, rights, and benefits of all persons in the service of the state, other than employees, as defined in §

36-12-1(2)

, whether employed, appointed, or elected, and the dependents of persons may also be deducted from the state payroll as provided in §§

36-6-12

and

36-6-13

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1960, ch. 136, § 3; P.L. 1981, ch. 276, § 1.

36-12-4.
Coverage of Non-Medicare-eligible retired employees.

Non-Medicare-eligible retired employees who retired on or before September 30, 2008. Any retired employee who retired on or before September 30, 2008, shall be entitled, until attaining Medicare eligibility, to be covered under §§

36-12-1

—

36-12-5

for himself and herself and, if he or she so desires, his or her non-Medicare-eligible dependents, upon agreeing to pay the total cost of his or her contract at the group rate for active state employees. Payments of any non-Medicare-eligible retired employee for coverage shall be deducted from his or her retirement allowance and remitted from time to time in payment for such contract. In addition, any retired employee who retired on or before September 30, 2008, shall be permitted to purchase coverage for his or her non-Medicare-eligible dependents upon agreeing to pay the additional cost of the contract at the group rate for active state employees. Payment for coverage for these dependents shall be deducted from his or her retirement allowances and remitted as required in payment for the contract.

Non-Medicare-eligible state retirees who retired subsequent to July 1, 1989, and on or before September 30, 2008. Non-Medicare-eligible state retirees who retired subsequent to July 1, 1989, and on or before September 30, 2008, from active service of the state, and who were employees of the state as determined by the retirement board under §

36-8-1

, shall be entitled to receive for himself or herself non-Medicare-eligible a retiree healthcare insurance benefit as described in §

36-12-1

in accordance with the following formula:

If the retired employee is receiving a subsidy on September 30, 2008, the state will continue to pay the same subsidy share until the retiree attains age sixty-five (65).

Until December 31, 2013, when the state retiree reaches that age which will qualify him or her for Medicare supplement, the formula shall be:

Non-Medicare-eligible retired employees who retire on or after October 1, 2008. Any retired employee who retires on or after October 1, 2008, shall be entitled, until attaining Medicare eligibility, to be covered under §§

36-12-1

—

36-12-5

for himself and herself and, if he or she so desires, his or her non-Medicare-eligible dependents, upon agreeing to pay the total cost of the contract in the plan in which he or she enrolls. Payments of any non-Medicare-eligible retired employee for coverage shall be deducted from his or her retirement allowance and remitted from time to time in payment for such contract. Any retired employee who retires on or after October 1, 2008, shall be permitted to purchase coverage for his or her non-Medicare-eligible dependents upon agreeing to pay the additional cost of the contract at the group rate for the plan in which the dependent is enrolled. Payment for coverage for dependents shall be deducted from the retired employee’s retirement allowances and remitted as required in payment for the contract. The Director of Administration shall develop and present to the chairpersons of the House Finance Committee and the Senate Finance Committee by May 23, 2008 a retiree health plan option or options to be offered to retirees eligible for state-sponsored medical coverage who are under age sixty-five (65) or are not eligible for Medicare. This plan will have a reduced benefit level and will have an actuarially based premium cost not greater than the premium cost of the plan offered to the active state employee population. This new plan option will be available to employees retiring after September 30, 2008, and their dependents.

Non-Medicare-eligible state retirees who retire on or after October 1, 2008. Non-Medicare-eligible state retirees who retire on or after October 1, 2008, from active service of the state, and who were employees of the state as determined by the retirement board under §

36-8-1

, and who have a minimum of twenty (20) years of service, and who are a minimum of fifty-nine (59) years of age, shall be entitled to receive for himself or herself a non-Medicare-eligible retiree healthcare insurance benefit as described in §

36-12-1

. The state will subsidize 80% of the cost of the health insurance plan for individual coverage in which the state retiree is enrolled in. Payments for coverage shall be deducted from his or her retirement allowance and remitted from time to time in payment for such contract.

Medicare-eligible state retirees who retire on or after October 1, 2008. Until December 31, 2013, the state shall subsidize eighty percent (80%) of the cost of the Medicare-eligible health insurance plan for individual coverage in which the state retiree is enrolled, provided the employee retired on or after October 1, 2008; has a minimum of twenty (20) years of service; and is a minimum of fifty-nine (59) years of age. Payments for coverage shall be deducted from his or her retirement allowance and remitted from time to time in payment for such health insurance plan.

Retired employees, including retired teachers, who are non-Medicare-eligible and who reach the age of sixty-five (65) shall be allowed to continue to purchase group healthcare insurance benefits in the same manner as those provided to retired employees who have not reached the age of sixty-five (65).

Years of Age Employee’s Service at Retirement State’s Share Share 10-15 60 50% 50% 16-22 60 70% 30% 23-27 60 80% 20% 28+ — 90% 10% 28+ 60 100% 0% 35+ any 100% 0%

Click to view

Years of Service State’s Share Employee’s Share 10 - 15 50% 50% 16 - 19 70% 30% 20 - 27 90% 10% 28+ 100% 0%

Click to view

History of Section.

P.L. 1960, ch. 136, § 4; P.L. 1989, ch. 227, § 2; P.L. 1998, ch. 259, § 1; P.L. 2008, ch. 9, art. 4, § 2; P.L. 2013, ch. 144, art. 2, § 1.

36-12-4.1.
Coverage of Medicare-eligible retired employees.

The director of the department of administration shall ensure retired employees access to Medicare-eligible retiree healthcare insurance. Under this program, the state will establish a health reimbursement account (HRA) funded by state contributions for each Medicare-eligible state retiree who elects to receive healthcare insurance through the state-sponsored program.

The funds contained in the HRA may be utilized for any eligible medical care expenses as defined in § 213(d) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, which includes reimbursements for healthcare insurance premiums.

The director of the department of administration shall procure services to maximize consumer choice and options with respect to the individual policies available to Medicare-eligible retirees.

The maximum state contribution to each Medicare-eligible state retiree’s HRA account will be equal to the lowest-cost Medicare supplemental plan that is filed with the Office of the Health Insurance Commissioner of Rhode Island, that is available through the state-sponsored program, and that meets the provisions of the Medicare-eligible retiree healthcare insurance benefit defined in §

36-12-1(9)

. The maximum state contribution will vary by age as specified by the rates set forth in the Medicare supplemental plan filing.

For Medicare-eligible state retirees who retired before September 30, 2008, effective January 1, 2014, the state of Rhode Island will credit an amount to each retiree’s HRA account on a monthly basis. The amount of such credit shall be calculated based on the retiree’s years of service, as a percentage of the maximum state contribution set forth in (d) above, and in accordance with the following formula:

For Medicare-eligible state retirees who retire on or after October 1, 2008, effective January 1, 2014, the state of Rhode Island will credit monthly an amount to each retiree’s HRA account equal to 80% of the maximum state contribution set forth in (d) above, provided the retiree has a minimum of twenty (20) years of service and is at least fifty-nine (59) years of age.

Medicare-eligible teacher retirees may purchase the individual policies available to Medicare-eligible state retirees under the state-sponsored program.

Years of Service State’s Contribution Employee’s Share 10 - 15 50% 50% 16 - 19 70% 30% 20 - 27 90% 10% 28+ 100% 0%

Click to view

History of Section.

P.L. 2013, ch. 144, art. 2, § 2.

36-12-5.
Annual appropriations.

The general assembly shall annually appropriate a sum sufficient to carry out the purposes of §§

36-12-1

—36-12-5. The state controller is hereby authorized and directed to draw his or her orders upon the general treasurer for the payment of the sum, or so much thereof as may be required from time to time, upon receipt by him or her of properly authenticated vouchers.

History of Section.

P.L. 1960, ch. 136, § 5.

36-12-6.
Authority to purchase group life, accidental death, long term health care, and other insurance benefits.

The director of administration, or any employee of the department of administration designated by the director as his or her agent, is hereby authorized, empowered, and directed to contract with one or more insurance companies duly licensed by this state for the purchase of one or more contracts providing for group life, accidental death, long term health care and other insurance benefits in conformity with the provisions of §§

36-12-6

—

36-12-14

, to purchase contracts of insurance and to administer all provisions of §§

36-12-6

—

36-12-14

. Before entering into any insurance contract under this chapter, the director shall invite proposals from such qualified insurers as in his or her opinion would desire to accept any part of the insurance coverage authorized by §§ 36-12-6 — 36-12-14 including hospital care and surgical-medical services with the specific condition that the benefits and services provided by the carrier(s) will be substantially equivalent to those set forth in any collective bargaining agreements executed between the state of Rhode Island and authorized representatives of the unions representing state employees or the health care coverage presently being provided.

The state will work diligently with leadership of organized labor in order to ensure competitiveness, cost effective health care services for all employees of the state who may be eligible for those benefits.

Any new plan must accept pre-existing conditions for those individuals who will be covered by the new policy.

The director may arrange with the company or companies from which the policy or policies of insurance authorized herein are purchased to reinsure portions of any contract or contracts of insurance with other insurance companies duly licensed in this state which elect to enter into contracts of reinsurance and are legally competent to do so. The director may annually redetermine the amount or amounts of coverage to be allocated to reinsuring companies in advance of any contract year after the first year.

The director may designate one or more of those insurance companies as the administering company or companies.

Each employee who is covered under any contract or contracts shall receive a certificate setting forth the benefits to which the employee and his or her dependents are entitled thereunder, to whom benefits shall be payable, to whom claims should be submitted, and summarizing the provisions of the contract principally affecting the employee and his or her dependents.

The director may, on June 30, 1961, or at the end of any fiscal year thereafter, discontinue any insurance contract or contracts he or she has purchased from any corporation or corporations and replace it or them with a contract or contracts in any other corporation or corporations meeting the requirements of §§

36-12-6

—

36-12-14

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1960, ch. 119, § 1; P.L. 1988, ch. 433, § 1; P.L. 1996, ch. 326, § 6.

36-12-7.
Eligibility for benefits.

All persons in the service of the state on and after July 1, 1960, whether elected, appointed or employed, who elect to participate in an insurance contract or contracts shall be eligible to participate therein. The director, however, with the consent of the insurance company or companies, may by rule or regulation exclude those classes of temporary, part-time, or intermittent employees for whom insurance contracts shall be deemed to be impracticable.

The director, with the consent of the insurance company or companies, may authorize the inclusion in insurance contracts of employees of public authorities, full-time employees of organizations representing state employees, or other appropriate agencies of the state as may be designated in the rules or regulations of the director, and may prescribe the rate of contribution required from such participating authorities, or other agencies.

History of Section.

P.L. 1960, ch. 119, § 2; P.L. 1968, ch. 235, § 1.

36-12-8.
Provisions of insurance contract.

The director is hereby authorized and directed to establish a life insurance plan for employees of the state as herein provided, which, subject to the conditions and limitations contained in §§

36-12-6

—

36-12-14

, and in the regulations promulgated pursuant to the authority vested in him or her by §§

36-12-6

—

36-12-14

, will provide for each participating employee group life insurance equal to the amount of his or her annual compensation, taken to the next higher multiple of one thousand dollars ($1,000), plus an equal amount of group accidental death insurance with dismemberment coverage as provided herein.

In addition to the benefits provided hereinbefore and subject to the conditions and limitations of the policy or policies purchased by the director, the policy or policies shall provide payments as follows:

For any one accident the aggregate amount of group accidental death and dismemberment insurance that may be paid shall not exceed the amount of life insurance provided by §§

36-12-6

—

36-12-14

.

The director shall by regulation provide for the conversion of other than annual rates of compensation to an annual basis and shall further specify the types of compensation to be included in annual compensation.

The amount of insurance shall be reduced by one percent (1%) thereof at the end of each calendar month following the date the employee attains the age of sixty-five (65), until the amount of the insurance reaches forty percent (40%) of the annual salary at age seventy (70). The amount of insurance shall remain at forty percent (40%) of the annual salary thereafter until the active employee reaches age seventy-four (74), at which point it shall be reduced to thirty percent (30%) of the annual salary until age eighty (80), at which point it shall be reduced to twenty-five percent (25%) of the annual salary and it shall remain at twenty-five percent (25%) thereafter.

Loss Amount Payable For accidental loss of life. An amount equal to the full amount of life insurance provided by this section. For accidental loss of one hand or one foot or loss of sight of one eye. An amount equal to one-half the amount of life insurance provided by this section. For accidental loss of two or more such members. An amount equal to the full amount of life insurance provided by this section.

Click to view

History of Section.

P.L. 1960, ch. 119, § 3; P.L. 1987, ch. 574, § 1.

36-12-9.
Beneficiaries — Payment of benefits.

The policy or policies issued hereunder shall include a provision prescribing the conditions under which an insured employee may designate and change the beneficiary or beneficiaries to receive insurance payable upon the death of the employee.

If, at the death of any employee insured hereunder, there shall be more than one designated beneficiary, then, unless the employee shall have specified the respective interests of the beneficiaries, the interests of the beneficiaries shall be several and equal. If any designated beneficiary shall predecease the employee, the rights and interest of the beneficiary shall thereupon automatically terminate. If, at the death of the employee, there be no designated beneficiary as to all or any part of the insurance, then the amount of the insurance payable for which there is no designated beneficiary shall be payable to the estate of the employee; provided, however, that the insurance company may, in that case, at its option, and subject to rules approved by the director, pay the amount to any one of the following surviving relatives: wife, husband, mother, father, child, or children. Payment to any one or more of the surviving relatives shall completely discharge the insurance company’s liability with respect to the amount of insurance so paid.

History of Section.

P.L. 1960, ch. 119, § 4.

36-12-10.
Participation by employees.

Any policy of insurance purchased by the director as authorized in §§

36-12-6

—

36-12-14

shall provide that all employees eligible under the terms of §§

36-12-6

—

36-12-14

will be automatically insured thereunder commencing on the date they first become so eligible; provided, that any employee desiring not to be so insured shall, on an appropriate form to be prescribed by the director, give written notice to the director that he or she desires not to be insured. If the notice is received before the employee shall have become insured under the policy he or she shall not be so insured; if it is received after he or she shall have become insured his or her insurance under the policy shall cease, effective with the end of the pay period during which the notice is received by the director.

History of Section.

P.L. 1960, ch. 119, § 5.

36-12-11.
Deductions from salary — Payments by employers.

During any period in which an employee under age sixty-five (65) is insured under a policy of insurance purchased by the director as authorized in §§

36-12-6

—

36-12-14

, there shall be withheld by the employer from each salary payment of the employee, as his or her share of the cost of his or her group life and accidental death and dismemberment insurance, an amount specified in the contract or policy which shall not exceed the rate of twenty-five cents (25¢) biweekly for each one thousand dollars ($1,000) of his or her group life insurance; provided, that an employee who is paid on other than a biweekly basis shall have an amount so withheld, determined at a proportionate rate, which rate shall be adjusted to the nearest cent.

The cost of providing the insurance benefits provided for in §§

36-12-6

—

36-12-14

, together with the cost of administration of the provisions of §§

36-12-6

—

36-12-14

in excess of the amounts paid by employees therefor, shall be paid by the participating employers in those proportions and at those times as the director may determine.

The payments shall be made by the participating employers out of appropriations made therefor, and the general assembly shall annually appropriate those sums to the fund herein created which may be required during the fiscal year.

The sums withheld from employees and the funds appropriated by participating employers as provided herein shall be deposited with the general treasurer of the state to the credit of a fund which is hereby created as the group life insurance fund.

During any period in which an employee is insured under a policy of long term health care insurance purchased by the director as authorized in §

36-12-6

, there shall be withheld by the employer from each salary payment of the employee as his or her cost of long term care insurance an amount specified in the contract or policy; provided, that an employee who is paid on other than a biweekly basis shall have an amount so withheld, determined at a proportionate rate, which rate shall be adjusted to the nearest cent.

History of Section.

P.L. 1960, ch. 119, § 6; P.L. 1988, ch. 433, § 1.

36-12-12.
Termination of insurance.

Each contract of insurance purchased under §§

36-12-6

—

36-12-14

shall contain a provision, in terms approved by the director, to the effect that any insurance thereunder on any employee shall cease upon the termination of his or her employment subject to a provision which shall be contained in the contract of insurance for temporary extension of coverage under conditions approved by the director and for conversion to an individual policy of life insurance for the employee, except that the director may by appropriate general regulation provide that an employee who retires, under the provisions of any retirement system of the state of Rhode Island, with the exception of that provided in §

42-28-22

, shall have his or her life insurance only, in effect at the time of retirement, continue in the amounts for which he or she would have been insured from time to time had his or her salary payments continued at the same rate as on the date of cessation of employment.

History of Section.

P.L. 1960, ch. 119, § 7; P.L. 1969, ch. 159, § 1; P.L. 1987, ch. 574, § 1.

36-12-13.
Regulations and effective date of insurance.

Subject to the provisions of §§

36-12-6

—

36-12-14

, the director is hereby authorized to promulgate such rules and regulations as may be necessary and proper to give effect to the intent and purposes of §§

36-12-6

—

36-12-14

, and without limiting the generality of the foregoing, to establish an effective date or dates for the insurance coverage provided hereunder.

History of Section.

P.L. 1960, ch. 119, § 8.

36-12-14.
Severability.

The provisions of §§

36-12-6

—

36-12-14

are hereby declared to be severable, and in case any part, section, or provision of §§

36-12-6

—

36-12-14

is held void by any court of competent jurisdiction, the remaining parts, sections, and provisions of §§ 36-12-6 — 36-12-14 shall not, thereby, be impaired or otherwise affected.

History of Section.

P.L. 1960, ch. 119, § 9.

36-12-15.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 2006, ch. 157, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 631, § 1; Repealed by P.L. 2006, ch. 157, § 3, effective June 21, 2006; . P.L. 2006, ch. 631, § 3, effective July 14, 2006.